District of Columbia statutes.
47-1046

American Legion, James Reese Europe Post No. 5, lot 33 in square 3508.

Certain property located in the District of Columbia described as lot 33 in square 3508 situated at 2027 North Capitol Street, N.E., together with improvements thereon and furnishings therein, with equitable and legal title in the name of the American Legion, James Reese Europe Post No. 5, is hereby exempt from all taxation so long as the same is used in carrying on the purposes and activities of the American Legion, James Reese Europe Post No. 5 and is not used for exclusively commercial purposes, subject to the provisions of §§ 47-1005, 47-1007, and 47-1009.

History

Oct. 16, 1998, D.C. Law 12-171, § 2, 45 DCR 5193
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 52(m-1), 45 DCR 5193

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1046.